Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION; MANUFACTURED HOME PARK INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS AND LOANS.new text end new text begin (a) $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the housing development fund. This transfer is $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for the manufactured home park infrastructure grants and loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.2035, subdivision 1b. new text end new text begin (c) By January 15 each year, the commissioner must submit a report on the use of funds in this subdivision to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over housing finance and policy. The report must include the following information: new text end new text begin (1) grants and loans requested and funded during the prior fiscal year, organized by ownership type of the manufactured home park, such as private, cooperative, and municipal ownership, and by county; new text end new text begin (2) the average amount of grants and loans awarded; new text end new text begin (3) the average amount of loans issued; new text end new text begin (4) information regarding the terms of the loans; and new text end new text begin (5) information about how repaid loan funds were used. new text end